Maryland, session 2026, HB1605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
10–501.
(a) (1) On receipt of an order by an administrative law judge granting a
petition under subsection (b) of this section, [subject to paragraph (5) of this subsection,]
the Board of Public Works shall compensate an individual erroneously convicted,
sentenced, and confined under State law for a crime the individual did not commit in an
amount equal to the product of the total number of days that the individual was wrongfully
confined after the erroneous conviction multiplied by a daily rate of the State’s most recent
annual median household income as published in the American Community Survey of the
U.S. Census Bureau in the year the order of eligibility is issued under subsection (b) of this
section and divided by 365 days to the nearest whole cent.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1605*

HOUSE BILL 1605
(2) In addition to the compensation awarded under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the administrative law judge issuing an order under subsection (b) of this
section may direct the appropriate State agency or service provider to provide to the
individual free of charge any of the following benefits:
(i) a State identification card and any other document necessary for
the individual’s health or welfare on the individual’s release from confinement;
(ii) housing accommodations for a period not exceeding 5 years after
the date the order of eligibility is issued under subsection (b) of this section;
(iii) education and training relevant to life skills, job and vocational
training, or financial literacy for a period of time until the individual elects to no longer
receive the education and training;
(iv) health care and dental care for at least 5 years after the date the
order of eligibility is issued under subsection (b) of this section;
(v) access to enrollment at and payment of tuition and fees for
attending a public senior higher education institution, a regional higher education center,
or the Baltimore City Community College for a period of enrollment not exceeding 8 years;
and
(vi) reimbursement for court fines, fees, and restitution paid by the
individual for the crime for which the individual was erroneously convicted, sentenced, and
confined.
(3) (i) If an individual previously received a monetary award from a
civil suit or entered into a settlement agreement with the State or a political subdivision of
the State for an erroneous conviction, sentence, or confinement, the amount owed to the
individual under this subsection shall be reduced by the amount of the monetary award or
settlement that was paid to the individual less any amount paid for attorney’s fees and
costs for litigating the award or settlement.
(ii) 1. If, after receiving compensation under this subsection, an
individual receives a monetary award from a civil suit or enters into a settlement
agreement with the State or a political subdivision of the State for an erroneous conviction,
sentence, or confinement, the individual shall reimburse the State the amount of money
paid under this section less any amount paid for attorney’s fees and costs for litigating the
award or settlement.
2. Reimbursement required under subsubparagraph 1 of this
subparagraph may not exceed the amount of the monetary award the individual received
in the civil suit or settlement agreement.

HOUSE BILL 1605 3
3. The State may obtain a lien against the monetary award
from a civil suit or settlement agreement to satisfy an obligation under subsubparagraph 1
of this subparagraph.
(4) If an individual eligible for compensation and benefits under this
subsection is deceased, the individual’s estate has standing to be compensated under this
subsection.
[(5) (i) Beginning in fiscal year 2026, the county government in the
county in which the conviction of an individual occurred shall pay to the State 50% of the
amount of compensation awarded to the individual under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) The payment shall be remitted annually to the Comptroller by
June 30 equal to 100% of the county’s share of costs for that fiscal year.
(iii) On October 1, December 1, March 1, and June 1 of each fiscal
year, the Board of Public Works shall notify the Comptroller and each county of the county’s
share of each erroneous conviction award during the fiscal year.
(iv) The Comptroller may withhold a portion of a local income tax
distribution of a county that fails to make timely payment in accordance with this section.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.